District of Columbia statutes.
32-213

Penalties.

(a)

A person commits an offense under this subchapter if that person:

(1)

Employs a minor or permits a minor to work in violation of this subchapter, of any regulation promulgated by the Board of Education pursuant to § 32-224, or of any order issued under the provisions of § 32-203; or

(2)

Interferes with the Board of Education, its officers or agents, or any other person authorized by the District to inspect places of employment of minors.

(b)

A person convicted of a 1st offense under this section shall be fined not less than $1,000 nor more than $3,000, or imprisoned not less than 10 days nor more than 30 days, or both. A person convicted of a 2nd or subsequent offense under this section shall be fined not less than $3,000 nor more than $5,000, or imprisoned not less than 30 days nor more than 90 days, or both. Each day during which a violation of this subchapter occurs shall constitute a separate offense.

(c)

The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by § 22-3571.01.

May 29, 1928, 45 Stat. 1003, ch. 908, § 15
renumbered as § 13 and amended June 15, 1976, D.C. Law 1-68, § 2(16), 23 DCR 521
July 12, 1988, D.C. Law 7-135, § 2(b), 35 DCR 4114
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 112(c), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 36-513.
1973 Ed., § 36-215.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (c).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 112(c) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.